hr-HR: Sadržaj pulpe: Visoki udio pulpe; Niski udio pulpe; Nektar; Bez pulpe; S pulpom; Ostalo
zh-TW: 果肉含量: 高果肉; 低果肉; 果蜜; 無果肉; 含果肉; 其他
da: Frugtkødsindhold: Meget frugtkød; Lidt frugtkød; Nektar; Uden frugtkød; Med frugtkød; Andet
sk-SK: Obsah dužiny: Vysoký obsah dužiny; Nízky obsah dužiny; Nektár; Bez dužiny; S dužinou; Iné
it: Contenuto di polpa: Molta polpa; Poca polpa; Nettare; Senza polpa; Con polpa; Altro
fr: Teneur en pulpe: Forte teneur en pulpe; Faible teneur en pulpe; Nectar; Sans pulpe; Avec pulpe; Autre
nb: Innhold av fruktkjøtt: Mye fruktkjøtt; Lite fruktkjøtt; Nektar; Uten fruktkjøtt; Med fruktkjøtt; Annet
en: Pulp content: High pulp; Low pulp; Nectar; No pulp; With pulp; Other
lt-LT: Tirščių kiekis: Daug minkštimo; Mažai minkštimo; Nektaras; Be minkštimo; Su minkštimu; Kita
es: Contenido de pulpa: Alto contenido de pulpa; Bajo contenido de pulpa; Néctar; Sin pulpa; Con pulpa; Otro
de: Fruchtfleischgehalt: Viel Fruchtfleisch; Wenig Fruchtfleisch; Nektar; Ohne Fruchtfleisch; Mit Fruchtfleisch; Sonstige
pt-BR: Polpa, conteúdo: Muita polpa; Pouca polpa; Néctar; Sem polpa; Com polpa; Outro
bg-BG: Съдържание на пулпа: Високо съдържание на пулп; Ниско съдържание на пулп; Нектар; Без пулп; С пулп; Друго
ko: 펄프 함량: 과육 많음; 과육 적음; 넥타; 과육 없음; 과육 포함; 기타
pl: Zawartość miąższu: Wysoka zawartość miąższu; Niska zawartość miąższu; Nektar; Bez miąższu; Z miąższem; Inne
tr: Posa içeriği: Çok posalı; Az posalı; Nektar; Posasız; Posalı; Diğer
ro-RO: Conținut de pulpă: Conținut ridicat de pulpă; Conținut redus de pulpă; Nectar; Fără pulpă; Cu pulpă; Altele
hu: Gyümölcshús tartalom: Magas rosttartalom; Alacsony rosttartalom; Nektár; Rostmentes; Rostos; Egyéb
fi: Hedelmäsosepitoisuus: Paljon hedelmälihaa; Vähän hedelmälihaa; Nektari; Ei hedelmälihaa; Sisältää hedelmälihaa; Muu
ru: Содержание мякоти: С большим количеством мякоти; С небольшим количеством мякоти; Нектар; Без мякоти; С мякотью; Другое
el: Περιεκτικότητα σε πολτό: Υψηλή περιεκτικότητα σε πολτό; Χαμηλή περιεκτικότητα σε πολτό; Νέκταρ; Χωρίς πολτό; Με πολτό; Άλλο
vi: Hàm lượng tép trái cây: Nhiều tép; Ít tép; Nectar; Không tép; Có tép; Khác
nl: Vruchtvlees gehalte: Veel vruchtvlees; Weinig vruchtvlees; Nectar; Geen vruchtvlees; Met vruchtvlees; Overig
th: ปริมาณเนื้อผลไม้: เนื้อผลไม้มาก; เนื้อผลไม้น้อย; น้ำผลไม้เนกตาร์; ไม่มีเนื้อผลไม้; มีเนื้อผลไม้; อื่นๆ
sv: Massainnehåll: Mycket fruktkött; Lite fruktkött; Nektar; Inget fruktkött; Med fruktkött; Övrigt
sl-SI: Vsebnost sadne kaše: Visoka vsebnost pulpe; Nizka vsebnost pulpe; Nektar; Brez pulpe; S pulpo; Drugo
ja: パルプ構造: 高果肉; 低果肉; ネクター; 果肉なし; 果肉入り; その他
cs: Obsah dužiny: Vysoký obsah dužiny; Nízký obsah dužiny; Nektar; Bez dužiny; S dužinou; Jiné
pt-PT: Teor de polpa: Elevado teor de polpa; Baixo teor de polpa; Néctar; Sem polpa; Com polpa; Outro
zh-CN: 果肉含量: 高果肉; 低果肉; 果蜜; 无果肉; 含果肉; 其他